Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 1. Selection and Challenges of Juries

Cross references. —

As to procedure relating to trial jurors, see Rule 24, W.R. Cr. P.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

47 Am. Jur. 2d Jury §§ 159 to 338.

Proof as to exclusion of or discrimination against eligible class or race in respect to jury in criminal case, 1 ALR2d 1291.

Excluding women from jury panel as violating accused's constitutional rights and ground for reversal, 9 ALR2d 661.

Right to jury trial before revocation of probation or suspension of sentence, parole or conditional pardon, 29 ALR2d 1074, 44 ALR3d 306.

Exclusion of attorneys from jury lists in criminal cases, 32 ALR2d 890.

Withdrawal of waiver of right to jury trial in criminal case, 46 ALR2d 919.

Right of counsel in criminal case personally to conduct the voir dire examination of prospective jurors, 73 ALR2d 1187.

Religious belief as ground for exemption or excuse from jury service, 2 ALR3d 1392.

Juror's voir dire denial or nondisclosure of acquaintance or relationship with attorney in case, or with partner or associate of the attorney, as ground for new trial or mistrial, 64 ALR3d 126.

Law enforcement officers as qualified jurors in criminal cases, 72 ALR3d 895.

Former law enforcement officers as qualified jurors in criminal cases, 72 ALR3d 958.

Propriety of order forbidding news media from publishing names and addresses of jurors in criminal cases, 36 ALR4th 1126.

Threats of violence against juror in criminal trial as ground for mistrial or dismissal of juror, 3 ALR5th 963.

Exclusion of public and media from voir dire examination of prospective jurors in state criminal case, 16 ALR5th 152.

Oral stipulation to proceed in federal criminal trial with less than 12 jurors and satisfying Rule 23(b) of Federal Rules of Criminal Procedure, 57 ALR Fed 367.

Examination and challenge of federal case jurors on basis of attitudes toward homosexuality, 85 ALR Fed 864.

Stranger's alleged communication with juror, other than threat of violence, as prejudicial in federal criminal prosecution, 131 ALR Fed 465.

50A C.J.S. Juries §§ 264 to 348.

§ 7-11-101.
Impaneling in criminal cases.

Trial juries for criminal actions in district courts and in circuit courts are formed in the same manner as trial juries in civil actions.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 23, § 34; R.S. 1899, § 3373; C.S. 1910, § 1012; C.S. 1920, § 1237; R.S. 1931, § 61-234; C.S. 1945, § 12-135; W.S. 1957, § 7-220; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to qualifications, selection and impaneling of juries in civil actions, see §§

1-11-101

to

1-11-129

and Rule 47, W.R.C.P.

For Wyoming Rules of Criminal Procedure for Justice of the Peace Courts and Municipal Courts, see Wyoming Court Rules Annotated.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “circuit courts” for “county courts,” and deleted the former last sentence which read: “Procedures for impaneling juries in justice of the peace courts shall be governed by the Wyoming Rules of Criminal Procedure for Justice Courts.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Rule 10, W.R. Cr. P.J.C. provides manner for impaneling juries in justice of peace criminal actions

and statutes in conflict with these procedural matters are no longer applicable. Petersen v. State, 594 P.2d 978,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 411

(Wyo. 1979) (decided prior to 1987 revision of this title).

§ 7-11-102.
Trial of accused.

In all criminal cases the jury summoned and impaneled according to the laws relating to the summoning or impaneling of juries in other cases, shall try the accused.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 119; R.S. 1887, § 3279; R.S. 1899, § 5340; C.S. 1910, § 6204; C.S. 1920, § 7501; R.S. 1931, § 33-701; C.S. 1945, § 10-1101; W.S. 1957, § 7-221; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to inviolate right to trial by jury in criminal cases, see art. 1, § 9, Wyo. Const.

Quoted

in

State ex rel. Suchta v. District Court, 74 Wyo. 48, 283 P.2d 1023,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(1955).

§ 7-11-103.
Peremptory challenges.

The defendant may challenge peremptorily, in capital cases, twelve (12) jurors, in other felonies eight (8) jurors, and in misdemeanors four (4) jurors. The prosecution may challenge peremptorily, in capital cases, twelve (12) jurors, in other felonies eight (8) jurors, and in misdemeanors four (4) jurors. The number of peremptory challenges allowed to the prosecution shall be multiplied by the number of defendants on trial in each case. Each defendant shall be allowed separate peremptory challenges.

All challenges made under subsection (a) of this section shall be secret challenges.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 120; Laws 1884, ch. 38, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 3280; Laws 1890, ch. 73, § 135; R.S. 1899, § 5341; C.S. 1910, § 6205; C.S. 1920, § 7502; R.S. 1931, § 33-702; Laws 1937, ch. 65, § 1; 1939, ch. 43, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 10-1102; W.S. 1957, § 7-222; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to peremptory challenges under the rules, see Rule 24(d), W.R. Cr. P.

Peremptory challenges proper. —

In an attempted first-degree murder case, defendant's equal protection rights under Batson were not violated by the prosecutor's exercise of two peremptory challenges against Hispanic jurors, where one of the Hispanic jurors knew one of the law enforcement witnesses, knew another witness's mother, and preferred not to miss an upcoming doctor's appointment, and the other Hispanic juror knew a witness.
Mattern v. State, 2007 WY 24, 151 P.3d 1116,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 551 U.S. 1153, 127 S. Ct. 3021, 168 L. Ed. 2d 741, 2007 U.S. LEXIS 8451 (U.S. 2007).

District court did not err in denying the motion asserting defendant’s trial attorney provided ineffective assistance of counsel when he failed to raise a challenge under Batson as the prosecutor testified that he struck Juror #116 because he did not have a spouse or children, did not have a job that interacts with people, and had recently changed jobs, and he or a family member had been a complainant, defendant, or witness in a criminal case; and the State’s reasons for utilizing a peremptory challenge on Juror # 116 were neutral and non-discriminatory. Yazzie v. State, 2021 WY 72, 487 P.3d 555,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 2021).

Additional peremptory challenge improperly allowed. —

Court committed reversible error in allowing prosecution an additional peremptory challenge after it had waived its last challenge, and after defendant had exercised all his peremptory challenges. State v. Jones, 27 Wyo. 46, 191 P. 1075,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1920).

Overruling challenge for cause when peremptory challenges notexhausted. —

There is no error in overruling challenge of a juror for cause, where defendant does not exhaust his right of peremptory challenges. Carter v. Territory, 3 Wyo. 193, 18 P. 750,

1888 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1888).

Cited

in

Schaeffer v. State, 2012 WY 9, 268 P.3d 1045,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Jan. 20, 2012).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Peremptory challenge after acceptance of juror, 3 ALR2d 499.

Effect of allowing excessive number of peremptory challenges, 95 ALR2d 957.

Number of peremptory challenges available where two or more defendants are tried together, 21 ALR3d 725.

Additional peremptory challenges because of multiple criminal charges, 5 ALR4th 533.

Use of peremptory challenges to exclude ethnic and racial groups, other than black Americans, from criminal jury—Post-Batson state cases, 20 ALR5th 398.

Use of peremptory challenges to exclude persons from criminal jury based on religious affiliation — post-Batson state cases, 63 ALR5th 375.

§ 7-11-104.
Trial of challenges for cause.

Both the defense and the prosecution may challenge jurors for cause prior to the jury being sworn. Challenges for cause shall be tried by the court.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 121; Laws 1879, ch. 20, § 1; 1884, ch. 38, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 3281; Laws 1890, ch. 73, § 136; R.S. 1899, § 5342; C.S. 1910, § 6206; C.S. 1920, § 7503; R.S. 1931, § 33-703; C.S. 1945, § 10-1103; W.S. 1957, § 7-223; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2.

It is obligation of defendant to examine jurors on voir dire

and discover by proper investigation facts affecting their qualifications, and then to seasonably raise that objection with respect to any member of the panel. Lopez v. State, 544 P.2d 855,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1976).

Failure to examine on particular ground waives it. —

A failure to directly and plainly examine jurors with respect to a particular basis for bias or prejudice, which later is developed, constitutes a waiver of that ground. Lopez v. State, 544 P.2d 855,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1976).

A failure to directly and plainly examine jurors with respect to a particular basis for bias or prejudice constitutes a waiver of a later claim of prejudice. If the jurors do not respond to the defendant's questions and the defendant has concerns about whether any of the jurors are prejudiced, he may challenge them for cause, as permitted under this section. Hamburg v. State, 820 P.2d 523,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1991), reh'g denied,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. Dec. 4, 1991).

Trial of question presented by challenge for having formedopinion. —

Question presented by a challenge to a juror, as having formed an opinion which would disqualify him, is one of mixed law and fact, and as far as the facts are concerned is to be decided by the court upon the evidence. Loy v. State, 26 Wyo. 381, 185 P. 796,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1919).

Quoted

in

Summers v. State, 725 P.2d 1033,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 614

(Wyo. 1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of defense in criminal prosecution to disclosure of prosecution information regarding prospective jurors, 86 ALR3d 571.

Examination and challenge of state case jurors on basis of attitudes toward homosexuality, 80 ALR5th 469.

§ 7-11-105.
General grounds for challenging jurors.

The following is good cause for challenge to any person called as a juror in a criminal case:

That he was a member of the grand jury which found the indictment;

That he has formed or expressed an opinion as to the guilt or innocence of the accused, or is biased or prejudiced for or against the accused;

In a case in which the death penalty may be imposed, he states that his views on capital punishment would prevent or substantially impair performance of his duties as a juror in accordance with his oath or affirmation and the instructions of the court;

That he is a relation within the fifth degree to the person alleged to be injured, or attempted to be injured, by the offense charged or to the person on whose complaint the prosecution was instituted, or to the defendant;

That he has served on a petit jury which was sworn in the same cause against the same defendant, and which jury either rendered a verdict which was set aside, or was discharged after hearing the evidence;

That he has served as a juror in a civil case brought against the defendant for the same act;

That he has been subpoenaed as a witness in the case.

The same challenges for cause shall be allowed in criminal prosecutions that are allowed to parties in civil cases.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 123; R.S. 1887, § 3282; R.S. 1899, § 5343; C.S. 1910, § 6207; C.S. 1920, § 7504; R.S. 1931, § 33-704; C.S. 1945, § 10-1104; W.S. 1957, § 7-224; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to challenges for cause allowed in civil cases, see §

1-11-203

.

As to death penalty, see §§

6-2-101

through

6-2-103

.

Whether jurors are impartial is a question of fact

to be decided by the trial judge. Summers v. State, 725 P.2d 1033,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 614

(Wyo. 1986).

Membership in association as ground for challenge. —

In prosecution for stealing sheep, fact that certain jurors were active members of cattle and sheep growers' associations, the purpose of which was to protect sheep growers, did not disqualify them, in absence of a showing that association was connected with or interested in the present prosecution. Starke v. State, 17 Wyo. 55, 96 P. 148,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1908).

Crime victim not biased as matter of law. —

The fact that a juror has been the victim of a crime not disclosed on voir dire does not require a conclusion of bias or partiality as a matter of law. Lopez v. State, 544 P.2d 855,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1976).

And absence of showing of actual bias prevents relief fromwaiver. —

With respect to the contention that the defendants, who were convicted of rape, were denied their right to a trial by an impartial jury where one of the jurors, a victim of a prior rape, had not disclosed that information at the voir dire examination, defendants not only waived that right as to this ground by their failure to examine with respect to it, but, furthermore, their failure to demonstrate on the record actual bias on the part of the juror would foreclose the possibility that they could, as a fundamental matter, claim any right to be relieved of the consequences of their waiver. Lopez v. State, 544 P.2d 855,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1976).

Speculative bias will not result in successful challenge

if the trial court determines that the prospective juror is able to decide the case solely on the evidence presented and according to the trial court's instructions on the law. Schwenke v. State, 768 P.2d 1031,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1989).

Questions as to child discipline and justification for takinghuman life properly refused. —

In a murder case where the accused was a victim of abuse by the deceased, there was no abuse of discretion in the refusal of the trial court to permit the defendant to raise specific questions relating to child discipline with members of the jury panel, as such questions were not designed to reveal bias or prejudice but to obtain the reaction of potential jurors to the defendant's defense theory and to anticipated evidence, and there was no error in refusing permission to the defendant to question jurors about their attitudes with respect to the justification for the taking of a human life. Jahnke v. State, 682 P.2d 991,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 292

(Wyo. 1984), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Juror's insistence on applying wrong evidentiary standard.—

The bias or prejudice of a juror, who had the avowed intention to apply the standard of “preponderance of the evidence,” rather than “proof beyond a reasonable doubt,” as required by the instructions, was definitely evidenced. Patterson v. State, 691 P.2d 253,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 348

(Wyo. 1984), cert. denied, 471 U.S. 1020, 105 S. Ct. 2048, 85 L. Ed. 2d 311, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 2663 (U.S. 1985), overruled, Jones v. State, 902 P.2d 686,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1995).

Finding of qualification not erroneous. —

A finding that a juror was not disqualified as having formed an opinion under this section was not manifestly erroneous under the evidence. See Loy v. State, 26 Wyo. 381, 185 P. 796,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1919).

Jury may be asked about death penalty views. —

In first degree murder prosecution, asking jury whether they had conscientious scruples against inflicting death penalty was not error, in view of the provision of subsection (a)(iii). State v. Aragon, 41 Wyo. 308, 285 P. 803,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1930); Hopkinson v. State, 632 P.2d 79,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1981), cert. denied, 455 U.S. 922, 102 S. Ct. 1280, 71 L. Ed. 2d 463, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 698 (U.S. 1982).

And jurors irrevocably opposed may be challenged. —

The trial court did not err by allowing all prospective jurors who were irrevocably opposed to the death penalty to be challenged for cause. Sims v. State, 496 P.2d 185,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1972).

An unqualified opinion that under no circumstances could the prospective juror vote for the death penalty is a proper ground for a challenge for cause under this section. Hopkinson v. State, 632 P.2d 79,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1981), cert. denied, 455 U.S. 922, 102 S. Ct. 1280, 71 L. Ed. 2d 463, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 698 (U.S. 1982).

There is nothing in the decision in Witherspoon v. Illinois, 391 U.S. 510, 88 S. Ct. 1770, 20 L. Ed. 2d 776, 1968 U.S. LEXIS 1469 (1968), which denies the right of the prosecution to challenge for cause those prospective jurors who say they could never vote to impose the death penalty. The case does condemn the dismissal of veniremen merely because they do not believe in capital punishment and acknowledge that they have conscientious or religious scruples against the infliction of the death penalty. Sims v. State, 496 P.2d 185,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1972).

Passing jury panel for cause waived

defendant's claim of reversible error based on trial court's failure to dismiss a potential juror for cause. Prindle v. State, 945 P.2d 1180,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 1997), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Appellant not facing death sentence may not complain. —

Because the matter of a death penalty was eliminated when the jury returned a verdict of guilty in the second degree, appellant could not complain because jurors who said they could never vote to impose the death penalty were excluded for cause, since he was not facing a death sentence. Sims v. State, 496 P.2d 185,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1972).

Juror cannot hear separate trials of defendants. —

Where two persons charged with a crime arising out of the same transaction are granted separate trials, a juror hearing the trial of the first defendant is not qualified as a juror for the subsequent trial of the second defendant, the reason being that the juror has formed or expressed an opinion upon the merits of the case. The refusal to excuse such an unqualified juror for cause is prejudicial where the defendant challenges the juror for cause, the court denies the challenge, the defendant does not accept the jury because of it, and he exhausts his peremptory challenges. Lee v. State, 743 P.2d 296,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 513

(Wyo. 1987).

Simplest method to challenge jury as being selected by systematic and intentional exclusion

of any group of persons would be to present the names of various persons who were entitled to be on the jury list and whose names were not contained thereon. Boyd v. State, 528 P.2d 287,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 247

(Wyo. 1974), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 871, 96 S. Ct. 137, 46 L. Ed. 2d 102, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 2819 (U.S. 1975).

Absence of class because of discrimination must be shown. —

In questioning the composition of a jury, mere showing that a class was not represented on a particular jury is not enough; there must be a clear showing that its absence was caused by discrimination. Boyd v. State, 528 P.2d 287,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 247

(Wyo. 1974), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 871, 96 S. Ct. 137, 46 L. Ed. 2d 102, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 2819 (U.S. 1975).

As result of systematic exclusion. —

Wherever the challenge to the jury array on the basis of racial exclusion has been recognized, it has stemmed from evidence of systematic and intentional exclusion of some group and not merely from the fact that there are numbers of a group in the community and a lack of their members on the jury array. Simms v. State, 492 P.2d 516,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 213

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 409 U.S. 886, 93 S. Ct. 104, 34 L. Ed. 2d 142, 1972 U.S. LEXIS 1757 (U.S. 1972).

Systematic exclusion not presumed from absence of blacks. —

Merely because no blacks are on a jury panel there is no presumption of systematic and intentional exclusion because of color. Boyd v. State, 528 P.2d 287,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 247

(Wyo. 1974), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 871, 96 S. Ct. 137, 46 L. Ed. 2d 102, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 2819 (U.S. 1975).

Specific evidence of racial exclusion essential. —

Conjecture can have no part in challenges to the jury array on the basis of racial exclusion, and specific evidence is essential to establish a prima facie case of exclusion. Simms v. State, 492 P.2d 516,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 213

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 409 U.S. 886, 93 S. Ct. 104, 34 L. Ed. 2d 142, 1972 U.S. LEXIS 1757 (U.S. 1972).

Applied

in

Shaffer v. State, 640 P.2d 88,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 297

, 31 A.L.R.4th 166 (Wyo. 1982); Olsen v. State, 2003 WY 46, 67 P.3d 536,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2003); Harlow v. State, 2003 WY 47, 70 P.3d 179,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 2003).

Quoted

in

Lopez v. State, 544 P.2d 855,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1976); Engberg v. State, 686 P.2d 541,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 301

(Wyo. 1984); Smethurst v. State, 756 P.2d 196,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1988); Smith v. State, 773 P.2d 139,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 1989); Smith v. State, 2008 WY 98, 190 P.3d 522,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Aug. 19, 2008); Smith v. State, 2009 WY 2, 199 P.3d 1052,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Jan. 13, 2009).

Stated

in

Vivion v. Brittain, 510 P.2d 21,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1973).

Cited

in

Murdica v. State, 22 Wyo. 196, 137 P. 574,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(1913).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Is the Current Test of the Constitutionality of Capital Punishment Proper? Hopkinson v. State, 632 P.2d 79,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1981), cert. denied, 455 U.S. 922, 102 S. Ct. 1280, 71 L. Ed. 2d 463, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 698 (1982),” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 681 (1982).

For case note, “Constitutional Law — Does the New Death Qualification Standard Ensure a Biased Jury? Wainwright v. Witt, 469 U.S. 412, 83 L. Ed. 2d 841, 105 S. Ct. 844, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 43 (1985),” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 579 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Racial, religious, economic, social or political prejudice of proposed juror as ground of challenge on voir dire in criminal case, 54 ALR2d 1204, 63 ALR3d 1052, 94 ALR3d 15, 95 ALR3d 172, 88 ALR Fed 7.

Right to interrogate juror on voir dire as to prejudice for or against particular class of witnesses, 99 ALR2d 7.

Claustrophobia or other neurosis of juror as subject of inquiry on voir dire or of disqualification of juror, 20 ALR3d 1420.

Prior service on grand jury which considered indictment against accused as disqualification for service on petit jury, 24 ALR3d 1236.

Violation of constitutional guarantee of trial by jury by permitting challenge for cause of prospective jurors having convictions against capital punishment, 39 ALR3d 550.

Membership in racially biased or prejudiced organization as proper subject of voir dire inquiry or ground for challenge, 63 ALR3d 1052.

Cure of prejudice resulting from statement by prospective juror during voir dire, in presence of other prospective jurors, as to defendant's guilt, 50 ALR4th 969.

Professional or business relations between proposed juror and attorney as ground for challenge for cause, 52 ALR4th 964.

Fact that juror in criminal case, or juror's relative or friend, has previously been victim of criminal incident as ground of disqualification, 65 ALR4th 743.

Propriety of inquiry on voir dire as to juror's attitude toward, or acquaintance with literature dealing with, amount of damage awards, 63 ALR5th 285.

§ 7-11-106.
Opinion formed from news reports or rumors.

It is not cause for challenge that a person called to act as a juror in a criminal case has formed or expressed an opinion as to the guilt or innocence of the accused from news media reports or rumor if:

The prospective juror states that he can lay aside his impression or opinion and render a verdict based on the evidence presented in court; and

The court is satisfied, from the examination of the prospective juror or from other evidence, that he will render an impartial verdict according to the law and the evidence submitted to the jury at trial.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 70, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 3283; Laws 1890, ch. 73, § 137; R.S. 1899, § 5343; C.S. 1910, § 6207; C.S. 1920, § 7504; R.S. 1931, § 33-704; C.S. 1945, § 10-1105; W.S. 1957, § 7-225; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Individual jury query not required.—

Defendant’s right to a fair trial was not denied when the district court refused to individually query jurors about pretrial publicity where all of the jurors who had seen the two articles at issue averred that they could decide the case based on the evidence at trial and the court’s instructions.
Pickering v. State, 2020 WY 66, 464 P.3d 236,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2020).

Defendant to demonstrate bias. —

Once the mandates of this section are satisfied, it becomes incumbent upon the defendant to demonstrate impartiality or bias. Smethurst v. State, 756 P.2d 196,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1988).

Defendant in criminal prosecution is entitled to impartial jury, not sympathetic one.

A corollary to that rule is that a defendant is not entitled to a jury ignorant of current events. Smethurst v. State, 756 P.2d 196,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1988).

Opinions which can be disregarded not cause for challenge. —

Opinions formed by persons summoned as jurors as to guilt or innocence of accused, from newspaper reports and neighborhood rumor, are not cause for challenge, if they swear they can disregard such opinions, and render impartial verdict, though such jurymen also say it will require proof to remove such opinions. Carter v. Territory of Wyo., 3 Wyo. 193, 18 P. 750,

1888 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(1888), rehearing denied, 3 Wyo. 193, 19 P. 443, 18 P. 750,

1888 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(1888), See, also, Loy v. State, 26 Wyo. 381, 185 P. 796,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1919).

Juror exposure to publicity about a criminal case is to be anticipated and, indeed, jurors may even have formed an opinion as to the guilt of the accused, which, by itself, is not a ground for requiring a change of venue. The test is whether a juror can lay aside his opinion and render a verdict based on the evidence. Amin v. State, 811 P.2d 255,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 1991); Nixon v. State, 994 P.2d 324,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1999).

Section must not be taken too literally, because it has definite constitutional limitations. —

Collins v. State, 589 P.2d 1283,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 355

(Wyo. 1979).

One of safeguards against effects of pretrial publicity

is the use of emphatic and clear instructions on the sworn duty of each juror to decide the issues only on evidence presented in open court. Collins v. State, 589 P.2d 1283,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 355

(Wyo. 1979).

Denial of venue change upheld. —

Denial of defendant's motion for a change of venue based on pretrial publicity was not an abuse of discretion where, even though many prospective jurors heard of the case, there was nothing to suggest prejudicial publicity and, where, as part of his overall trial strategy, defendant's counsel actually read portions of newspaper articles to the jury. Sides v. State, 963 P.2d 227,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1998).

Applied

in

Shaffer v. State, 640 P.2d 88,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 297

, 31 A.L.R.4th 166 (Wyo. 1982); Smith v. State, 773 P.2d 139,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 1989).

Quoted

in

Armstrong v. State, 826 P.2d 1106,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1992).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Juror's reading of newspaper account of trial in federal criminal case during its progress as ground for mistrial, new trial or reversal, 85 ALR Fed 13.

§ 7-11-107.
Oath or affirmation.

As soon as the jury is selected an oath or affirmation shall be administered to the jurors providing, in substance, that they and each of them will well and truly try the matter in issue between the state of Wyoming, plaintiff, and the named defendant, and render a true verdict according to the evidence.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 14, § 126; R.S. 1887, § 3286; R.S. 1899, § 5344; C.S. 1910, § 6208; C.S. 1920, § 7505; R.S. 1931, § 33-705; C.S. 1945, § 10-1106; W.S. 1957, § 7-226; Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to oaths generally, see chapter 2 of title 1.

Failure to administer oath before beginning trial not reversibleerror. —

Trial court's denial of defendant's motion for a mistrial was upheld on appeal where the mistake was discovered in the afternoon of the second day of a seven-day trial after the testimony of only three of 37 witnesses testifying for the state, the jury was sworn in long before deliberations, and the jury was informed it was to consider all the evidence presented, both before and after the oath, in the same manner. Urbigkit v. State, 2003 WY 57, 67 P.3d 1207,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2003).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Absence of accused during swearing of jury, 33 ALR4th 429.